Maryland, session 2026, HB0811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
10–1201.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Aging–in–place program” means a program or service that enables an
individual to live in the individual’s own home and participate in a community safely,
independently, and comfortably, regardless of age, income, or ability level.
(3) “MULTIGENERATIONAL THIRD PLACE” MEANS A COMMUNITY
SPACE OTHER THAN A PERSONAL HOME OR WORKPLACE THAT SUPPORTS SOCIAL
CONNECTION, EVENTS, OR GATHERING AMONG INDIVIDUALS OF DIFFERENT AGES.
[(3)] (4) “Senior village” means a local, member–driven, nonprofit
organization that:
(i) supports community members who choose to age in place by:
1. fostering social connections through activities and events;
and
2. coordinating volunteer help at home using a
neighbor–helping–neighbor model; and
(ii) is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(b) The Department may make grants to nonprofit organizations and area
agencies on aging to:
(1) expand and establish aging–in–place programs for seniors; AND
(2) SUPPORT SOCIAL CONNECTION FOR INDIVIDUALS IN
AGING–IN–PLACE PROGRAMS THROUGH EVENTS OR GATHERINGS AT
MULTIGENERATIONAL THIRD PLACES.
(c) Any nonprofit organization or area agency on aging may apply to the
Department for a State grant to be applied toward:
(1) the cost of expanding or establishing an aging–in–place program that
provides to seniors:

HOUSE BILL 811 3
[(1)] (I) assistance with the costs of in–home personal care services for
activities of daily living, including bathing, personal hygiene and grooming, dressing,
toileting, functional mobility, food preparation, laundry, and house cleaning;
[(2)] (II) psychological, economic, or functional assistance to enable
successful health management, access to medical care, or compliance with treatment
recommendations;
[(3)] (III) awareness of and access to resources, services, and benefits;
[(4)] (IV) support services and care coordination;
[(5)] (V) affordable transportation;
[(6)] (VI) assistance making in–home modifications or repairs to improve
safety, mobility, and accessibility; or
[(7)] (VII) the opportunity to live in a senior village; OR
(2) OPERATIONAL COSTS, INCLUDING ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OR
SHORT–TERM OR LONG–TERM LEASES OR RENTAL COSTS, FOR A SENIOR VILLAGE
TO PROVIDE ACCESS TO MULTIGENERATIONAL THIRD PLACES.
(d) To be eligible for a State grant to expand an existing aging–in–place program
under this section, a nonprofit organization or area agency on aging shall demonstrate an
equal match for funds requested.
(e) The Department shall publicize the availability of grant opportunities under
the aging–in–place program to eligible organizations at least 6 weeks before grant
applications are due.
(f) The amount of the State grant for an aging–in–place program shall be
determined after consideration of:
(1) all eligible applicants;
(2) the total amount of State funds available for grants; and
(3) the priorities of area need as may be established by the Department in
consultation with area agencies on aging and in alignment with area plans on aging.
(g) (1) For each fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of at least $100,000 for the purpose of making the State grants under
this section.

HOUSE BILL 811
(2) At least 20% of the funding appropriated under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be used to support senior villages.
(h) The Department shall notify an area agency on aging within 2 weeks after a
grant award to a nonprofit located within the jurisdiction of the area agency on aging.
(i) The Department may adopt regulations for receiving and considering
applications and for disbursing funds to applicants.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.